Utah statutes.
79-4-501.    Peace officer authority of park rangers.
(1)  The division has the duty to:
(a)  protect state parks and park property from misuse or damage; and
(b)  preserve the peace within state parks.
(2)  Employees of the division who are POST certified peace officers and who
are designated as park rangers by the division director, are law enforcement
officers under Section 53-13-103 and have all the powers of law enforcement
officers in the state, with the exception of the power to serve civil process.
(3)  The division has the authority to deputize persons who are peace officers
or special function officers to assist park rangers on a seasonal temporary
basis.
